Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-277
Conveyances; claims
and improvements upon public lands; law applicable.

Sections 76-201 to 76-281 and 76-2,126 apply to the conveyance of all
claims and improvements upon the public lands.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 35, p. 287;

R.S.1913, § 6231;

C.S.1922, § 5630;

C.S.1929, § 76-236;

R.S.1943, § 76-277;

Laws 2012, LB536, § 34.

For other provisions for conveyance of public lands and buildings, see Chapter 72.